New Jersey, session 222, S1741.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 1 of P.L.1993, c.366 (C.2A:62A-21) is amended to read as follows: 1.  a.  In addition to any other right of action or recovery otherwise available under law, whenever any law enforcement officer, firefighter, or member of a duly incorporated first aid, emergency, ambulance or rescue squad association suffers any injury, disease or death while in the lawful discharge of his official duties and that injury, disease or death is directly or indirectly the result of the neglect, willful omission, or willful or culpable conduct of any person or entity, other than that law enforcement officer, firefighter or first aid, emergency, ambulance or rescue squad member's employer or co-employee, the law enforcement officer, firefighter, or first aid, emergency, ambulance or rescue squad member suffering that injury or disease, or, in the case of death, a representative of that law enforcement officer, firefighter or first aid, emergency, ambulance or rescue squad member's estate, may seek recovery and damages from the person or entity whose neglect, willful omission, or willful or culpable conduct resulted in that injury, disease or death. b.  (1)  Whenever property under the control of a public utility results in a potentially dangerous condition that is accessible to the general public, and the State or a local unit of government deploys one or more law enforcement officers, firefighters, public works employees, or other persons to secure the potentially dangerous condition of property for the purpose of protecting the safety and welfare of the general public from exposure to the potentially dangerous condition, the State or local unit of government may file a claim for reimbursement with the public utility responsible for maintaining the property for the costs incurred by the State or local unit of government in securing the potentially dangerous condition of property and protecting the general public from exposure to the potentially dangerous condition.  A public utility that receives a claim for reimbursement pursuant to this subsection shall pay over to the State or local unit of government the amount of costs incurred by the State or local unit.  The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the period during which the property at issue is the subject of a declared state of emergency. (2)  As a condition to filing a claim for reimbursement with a public utility pursuant to this subsection, the State or local unit of government shall have: provided notice to the public utility of the potentially dangerous condition, informing the public utility of its duty and obligation to secure the potentially dangerous condition; and deployed personnel to secure the scene. (3)  The State or a local unit of government shall not file a claim pursuant to this subsection if, within one hour following the State or a local unit of governments provision of notice pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the public utility has deployed personnel sufficient to assume control over the potentially dangerous condition and to protect the general public from risk of injury or loss. (4)  Within 45 days of the date of enactment of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the Commissioner of Community Affairs shall establish a fee schedule to guide the State and local units of government in preparing and submitting claims for reimbursement to public utilities, which fee schedule shall be based upon: the Schedule of Equipment Rates covering costs eligible under the federal Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. s.5121, et seq.; and information regarding the use of that schedule as described in 44 C.F.R. s.206.228 Allowable Costs. (5)  (a)  Within 30 days of the date of enactment of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the Board of Public Utilities shall: review and verify the names and emergency contact information filed with the board by each public utility pursuant to R.S.48:2-17; and compile and deliver to the Commissioner of Community Affairs a list of the names and emergency contact information for the persons to contact to inform a public utility of an emergency.  Thereafter, the board shall inform the commissioner each time a public utility files a change of its emergency contact information with the board. (b)  Within 15 days of the Commissioner of Community Affairs receipt of the list of names and emergency contact information from the Board of Public Utilities pursuant to subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, and thereafter as soon as possible following the commissioners receipt of a public utilitys change of its emergency contact information with the board, the commissioner shall disseminate this information to the appropriate offices of State government and to local units of government. (6)  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a public utility shall not include amounts that a public utility pays, or is required to pay, to the State or a local unit of government pursuant to this subsection in the information the public utility provides to the Board of Public Utilities as part of a base rate case filed by the public utility, and the Board of Public Utilities shall not consider any such amounts improperly included by a public utility. (cf: P.L.1993, c.366, s.1) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.